Illinois, session 104th, SB3205.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 532, 538.7, and 545 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/532)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1065.82)7    Sec. 532. Purpose. 8    (a) The purpose of this Article is to provide a mechanism 9for the payment of covered claims under certain insurance 10policies, to avoid excessive delay in payment of covered 11claims, to avoid financial loss to claimants or policyholders 12because of the entry of an Order of Liquidation against an 13insolvent company, including through services offered to the 14Director in her or his capacity as receiver under Article XIII 15of this Code that relate to covered claims, to provide a Fund 16to assess among member companies the costs of such protection 17and maintain the continuity and self-sufficient operation of 18the Fund, and to offset the costs associated with maintaining 19the Fund's continuity and self-sufficient operations when 20practical by providing assistance and services to the Director 21in her or his capacity as receiver under Article XIII of this 22Code as described in this Section.23    (b) The purpose of this Article is also to provide a   SB3205 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17519 BAB 30946 b1mechanism for the Fund to participate in and facilitate the 2process by which the assets of an insolvent company are 3marshaled and distributed pursuant to Article XIII of this 4Code beyond reimbursing the cost of covered claims. This 5subsection (b) is inoperative 5 years after the effective date 6of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly this 7amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 8(Source: P.A. 102-396, eff. 8-16-21.) 9    (215 ILCS 5/538.7)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1065.88-7)10    Sec. 538.7. (a) The Fund may perform such other acts as are 11necessary or proper to effectuate the purposes of this 12Article.13    (b) The Fund may contract with the Office of Special 14Deputy Receiver or any other person or organizations 15authorized by law to carry out the duties of the Director in 16her or his capacity as a receiver under Article XIII of this 17Code. The power of the Fund to contract with these persons or 18entities includes, but is not limited to, providing consulting 19services and claims administration services that assist with 20these persons or entities in the performance of their 21respective statutory and legal functions provided by law. The 22Fund may only exercise the authority to contract pursuant to 23this subsection upon the board of director's written 24determination that the provisioning of such services will 25advance the purposes set forth in Section 532. Any contract   SB3205 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17519 BAB 30946 b1the Fund may enter into to provide services pursuant to this 2subsection shall be subordinate and subject to the Fund's 3statutory obligations to timely pay covered claims and avoid 4financial loss to claimants or policyholders described in this 5Article. 6    This subsection (b) is inoperative 5 years after the 7effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 8Assembly this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 9(Source: P.A. 102-396, eff. 8-16-21.) 10    (215 ILCS 5/545)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1065.95)11    Sec. 545. Effect of paid claims. 12    (a) Every insured or claimant seeking the protection of 13this Article shall cooperate with the Fund to the same extent 14as such person would have been required to cooperate with the 15insolvent company. The Fund shall have all the rights, duties 16and obligations under the policy to the extent of the covered 17claim payment, provided the Fund shall have no cause of action 18against the insured of the insolvent company for any sums it 19has paid out except such causes of action as the insolvent 20company would have had if such sums had been paid by the 21insolvent company and except as provided in subsection (d) of 22this Section. Any person recovering under this Article and any 23insured whose liabilities are satisfied under this Article 24shall be deemed to have assigned the person's or insured's 25rights under the policy to the Fund to the extent of his or her   SB3205 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17519 BAB 30946 b1recovery or satisfaction obtained from the Fund's payments. 2    (b) The Fund and any similar organization in another state 3shall be recognized as claimants in the liquidation of an 4insolvent company for any amounts paid by them on covered 5claims obligations as determined under this Article or similar 6laws in other states and shall receive dividends at the 7priority set forth in paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of 8Section 205 of this Code; provided that if, at the time that 9the liquidator issues a cut-off notice to the Fund in 10anticipation of closing the estate, a reserve has been 11established by the Fund, or any similar organization in 12another state, for the amount of their future administrative 13expenses and loss development associated with unpaid reported 14pending claims, these reserves will be deemed to have been 15paid as of the date of the notice and payment shall be made 16accordingly. The liquidator of an insolvent company shall be 17bound by determinations of covered claim eligibility under the 18Act and by settlements of claims made by the Fund or a similar 19organization in another state on the receipt of certification 20of such payments, to the extent those determinations or 21settlements satisfy obligations of the Fund, but the receiver 22shall not be bound in any way by those determinations or 23settlements to the extent that there remains a claim in the 24estate for amounts in excess of the payments by the Fund. In 25submitting their claim for covered claim payments the Fund and 26any similar organization in another state shall not be subject   SB3205 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17519 BAB 30946 b1to the requirements of Sections 208 and 209 of this Code and 2shall not be affected by the failure of the person receiving a 3covered claim payment to file a proof of claim.4    (c) The expenses of the Fund and of any similar 5organization in any other state, other than expenses incurred 6in the performance of duties under Section 547 or similar 7duties under the statute governing a similar organization in 8another state, shall be accorded priority over all claims 9against the estate, except as provided for in paragraph (a) of 10subsection (1) of Section 205 of this Code. The liquidator 11shall make prompt reimbursement to the Fund and any similar 12organization for such expense payments.13    (d) The Fund has the right to recover from the following 14persons the amount of any covered claims (as determined 15without regard to the exemption in paragraph (iv) of 16subsection (b) of Section 534.3) and allocated claims expenses 17which the Fund paid or incurred on behalf of such person in 18satisfaction, in whole or in part, of liability obligations of 19such person to any other person:20        (i) any insured whose net worth on December 31 of the 21    year next preceding the date the company becomes an 22    insolvent company exceeds $25,000,000; provided that an 23    insured's net worth on such date shall be deemed to 24    include the aggregate net worth of the insured and all of 25    its affiliates as calculated on a consolidated basis.26        (ii) any insured who is an affiliate of the insolvent   SB3205 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17519 BAB 30946 b1    company.2    The Fund may also, at its sole discretion and without 3assumption of any ongoing duty to do so, pay any workers 4compensation claims or any other third-party claims or any 5cybersecurity insurance obligations covered by a policy of an 6insolvent company on behalf of a high net worth insured as 7defined in paragraph (iv) of subsection (b) of Section 534.3. 8In that case, the Fund shall recover from the high net worth 9insured under this Section for all amounts paid on its behalf, 10all allocated claim adjusted expenses related to such claims, 11the Fund's attorney's fees, and all court costs in any action 12necessary to collect the full amount to the Fund's 13reimbursement under this Section. 14    (e) Venue in a suit against the Fund arising under this 15Article shall be in Cook County and Sangamon County. The Fund 16shall not be required to give any appeal bond in an appeal that 17relates to a cause of action under this Article.18(Source: P.A. 103-113, eff. 6-30-23.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.